Hawaii statutes.
LEASES

§501-121 Leases; registration required.
Leases of registered land for a term of one year or more shall be registered.
[L 1903, c 56, §64; RL 1925, §3253; RL 1935, §5063; RL 1945, §12663; am L 1951,
c 142, §4; RL 1955, §342-63; HRS §501-121]

Cross References

Land subject to mortgage or lease, see §501-29.

Case Notes

Purchaser of lease noted on certificate of title holds free
of unregistered sublease. 33 H. 343.

Cited: 60 H. 40, 587 P.2d 294.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next